New York, session 2025-2026, A3170.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. A temporary state commission, to be known as the "temporary 2 state pesticide commission", is hereby created to study and make recom- 3 mendations relating to the application of pesticides in cities with a 4 population of one million or more. 5 § 2. The commission shall consist of eleven members to be appointed as 6 follows: five shall be appointed by the governor; two shall be appointed 7 by the temporary president of the senate and one by the minority leader 8 of the senate; and two shall be appointed by the speaker of the assembly 9 and one by the minority leader of the assembly. The members of the 10 commission shall serve at the pleasure of the official making the 11 appointment of such member. Of the five members appointed by the gover- 12 nor, one shall be from the department of health and one shall be from 13 the department of environmental conservation. The remaining nine members 14 of the commission must reside in a city with a population of one million 15 or more. Vacancies in the membership of the commission shall be filled 16 in the manner provided for original appointments. Membership on the 17 commission shall not constitute a public office. A chairperson and vice- 18 chairperson of the commission shall be elected by a majority of its 19 members, all members being present. 20 § 3. The members of the commission shall receive no compensation for 21 their services, but shall be allowed their actual and necessary expenses 22 incurred in the performance of their duties pursuant to this act. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03333-01-5 A. 3170 2 1 § 4. The commission shall make a report of its findings and make any 2 recommendations it may deem necessary and appropriate to the governor, 3 the temporary president of the senate and the speaker of the assembly no 4 later than one year after the effective date of this act. 5 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.